Louisiana, session 2026, SB505.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 30:2195.2(A)(5) and (6)(a)(ii), (b), (c), (d), and (e) are hereby
amended and reenacted, and R.S. 30:2195.2(A)(6)(f) and (g) are hereby enacted to read as
follows:
§2195.2. Uses of the Tank Trust Account
A. The department shall administer the Tank Trust Account and shall make
disbursements from the account for all necessary and appropriate expenditures.
Pursuant to the authorization in R.S. 30:2195, the secretary of the Department of
Environmental Quality shall use the Tank Trust Account as follows:
* * *
(5) The Tank Trust Account may be used to make payments to a third party
who brings a third-party claim against the secretary of the department and any owner
of a motor fuel underground storage tank because of damages sustained by a release
into the groundwater, surface waters, or soils and who obtains a final judgment in
said action enforceable in this state against the owner and the secretary if and only
if it has been satisfactorily demonstrated that the owner was an eligible participant
at the time that the release occurred as defined in R.S. 30:2194(B)(3). The
indemnification limit of the trust with respect to satisfaction of third-party claims
shall be that which is necessary to satisfy federal petroleum underground storage
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 505 ENROLLED
tank financial responsibility requirements.
(6) * * *
(a) A grant or loan may only be made pursuant to this Paragraph if all of the
following apply:
* * *
(ii) The site is registered with the department as a single wall
underground storage tank system was installed prior to December 20, 2008.
* * *
(b) Grants provided pursuant to this Paragraph shall only be made in the form
of reimbursement for completed upgrades and improvements after inspection and
approval by the department. Applicants shall complete the upgrade or
improvement no later than three years from approval for participation in the
program.
(c)No grant or loan shall exceed one hundred fifty thousand dollars, and the
total amount of grants per year shall not exceed three million dollars The board
annually shall limit the maximum amount of funds to be awarded for a single
grant or loan, not to exceed three hundred thousand dollars.
(d) The board annually shall limit the total amount of funds to be
awarded for grants and loans in an amount not to exceed seventy-five percent
of the unobligated balance of the interest account of the Tank Trust Account.
(e) Eligible applicants may only apply for one grant or loan each year. The
department shall establish rules to ensure that an owner may participate in the
program no more than once per fiscal year. For purposes of this Subparagraph,
an owner shall be the natural person or juridical entity that owns the
underground storage tank project facility where the grant will be applied.
Applicants to the program shall be required to disclose the ownership structure
of the underground storage tank project facility.
(e)(f) The maximum number of grants and loans awarded per
application period and per fiscal year shall be set by the board, not to exceed
twenty per application period and forty per fiscal year. The application periods
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 505 ENROLLED
for grants and loans shall be as follows:
(i) First quarter, from July first to September thirtieth.
(ii) Third quarter, from January first to March thirty-first.
(g) The secretary shall promulgate rules and regulations to implement this
Paragraph, including the application process, procedures the applicant shall follow
prior to making upgrades or improvements to the site, inspection and approval of
upgrades or improvements by the department, and procedures the applicant shall
follow after completing the work to either claim reimbursement or begin making
repayments.
* * *
Section 2. The provisions of this Act shall apply to sites that receive approval on or
after July 1, 2026.
Section 3. This Act shall become effective on July 1, 2026; if vetoed by the governor
and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become effective on the day
following such approval by the legislature or July 1, 2026, whichever is later.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.